Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.345

Damages—Civil action not precluded.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude any person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter from bringing suit in a court of competent jurisdiction for damages arising from the violation.

[ 1989 c 380 s 29.]